Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2803.4 of Title 12, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A statement that purports to narrate, describe, report, or


explain an incident or incidents of poisoning with intent to kill,


shooting with intent to kill, or assault with intent to kill as


provided for in Sections 651, 652, and 653 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes:


1. Made by the victim to a law enforcement officer within one


(1) week of the incident;


2. On an application for a protective order by the victim


within one (1) week of the incident; or



Req. No. 2938 Page 1


3. Given as testimony of the victim made at a hearing on


application for a protective order,


shall be admissible in pretrial or posttrial criminal and juvenile


delinquent prosecutions including preliminary hearings, prosecutive


merit hearings, or hearings on the revocation of probation or


acceleration of a deferred judgment.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2938 CN 1/13/2026 1:16:12 PM































Req. No. 2938 Page 2